Mississippi, session 2026, HB1439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a)  "Private auditor" means a private auditing firm selected by and serving at the will and pleasure of the Governor. (b)  "Department" means the State Department of Health. (c)  "Federal and state abstinence education law" means the requirements of Section 37-13-171, Mississippi Code of 1972; Title V, Section 510 of the Social Security Act; and 42 USC Section 710. (d)  "Board" means the State Board of Medical Licensure. (e)  "REAP Act" means the Regulate Experimental Adolescent Procedures Act, Section 41-141-1 et seq. (f)  "Women's Health Defense Act of 2013" means Section 41-41-101 et seq. (2)  On or before June 1, 2026, the Governor shall select a private auditor to perform an audit of the department and the board.  The audit shall determine the extent of each audited agency's compliance with, and efforts to comply with, as applicable: (a)  The federal and state abstinence education law; (b)  The REAP Act; and (c)  The Women's Health Defense Act of 2013. (3)  As part of the audit, the private auditor shall have authority to request documents from the audited agency, to conduct interviews of agency personnel and other interested parties, and to pose written questions to the agency, which shall be answered by agency personnel within sixty (60) days of receipt of the request. (4)  No later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the private auditor's appointment, the private auditor shall provide to each audited agency a preliminary report detailing the agency's apparent noncompliance with the federal and state laws listed in subsection (2) of this section.  Each audited agency shall provide the private auditor with its objections to these findings, reasons therefor, and any supporting documentation, and shall explain the agency's reason for any cited noncompliance. (5)  On or before January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of each succeeding year, the private auditor shall provide a report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and Speaker of the House of Representatives detailing the findings of the audit required by this section.  The reports shall be considered public records under the Mississippi Public Records Act. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.